Oklahoma, session 2026, SB833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 1

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1722, as
amended by Section 255, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1722), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1722. A. Any person who shall unlawfully take any
crude oil or gasoline, or any product thereof, from any pipe,
pipeline, tank, tank car, or other receptacle or container and any
person who shall unlawfully take or cause to be taken any machinery,
drilling mud, pipes, fittings, pumps, and all other equipment or
other materials necessary for the drilling or production of oil or
gas wells, with intent to deprive the owner or lessee thereof of
said crude oil, gas, gasoline, or any product thereof, machinery,
drilling mud, pipes, fittings, pumps, and all other equipment or
other materials necessary for the drilling or production of oil or
gas wells shall:
1. Be guilty of a misdemeanor if the value of said product so
taken is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), and, upon
conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than
Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county
jail for a term not to exceed sixty (60) days, or by both such fine
and imprisonment; and
2. Be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense if the value of such
product so taken is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more and,
upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by forfeiture of the
instrumentality of the crime and by a fine of not less than One
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 2

Hund red Dollars ($100.00), and not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00), or by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term in the range of one (1)
year to ten (10) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Any person violating the provisions of this section who:
1. Takes such product and causes environmental damage to the
real property as a direct result of the taking of such product; and
2. The direct costs of remediation or restoration of the
environmentally damaged real property exceeds the amount of Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), shall, upon conviction,
be guilty of a felony.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026."
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate



ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 3

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 833 By: Daniels of the Senate

and

Tedford of the House


An Act relating to personal injury suits; amending 12
O.S. 2021, Section 3009.1, which relates to medical
bills; stating criteria to determine satisfaction of
certain financial obligation; authorizing certain
admissible amounts in certain circumstances;
prohibiting certain retroactivity; providing for
codification; and providing an effective date.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 3009.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3009.1. A. Upon the trial of any civil action arising
from personal injury, the actual amounts paid for any services in
the treatment of the injured party, including doctor bills, hospital
bills, ambulance service bills, drug and other prescription bills,
and similar bills shall be the amounts admissible at trial, not the
amounts billed for such expenses incurred in the treatment of the
party. If, in addition to evidence of payment, a party submits a
signed statement acknowledged by the medical provider or an
authorized representative or sworn testimony that the provider will
accept the amount paid as full payment of the obligations, the
ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 1

stat ement or testimony shall be admitted into evidence. The
statement or testimony shall be part of the record as an exhibit but
need not be shown to the jury. If a medical provider has filed a
lien in the case for an amount in excess of the amount paid, then
the bills in excess of the amount paid, but not more than the amount
of the lien, shall be admissible.
B. If no payment has been made, the Medicare reimbursement
rates in effect when the personal injury occurred, not the amounts
billed, shall be admissible if, in addition to evidence of
nonpayment, a party submits a signed statement acknowledged by the
medical provider or an authorized representative or sworn testimony
that the provider will accept payment at the Medicare reimbursement
rate less cost of recovery as provided in Medicare regulations as
full payment of the obligation. The statement or testimony shall be
admitted into evidence and shall be part of the record as an exhibit
but need not be shown to the jury. If a medical provider has filed
a lien in the case for an amount in excess of the Medicare rate,
then the bills in excess of the amount of the Medicare rate, but not
more than the amount of the lien, shall be admissible.
C. If no bills have been paid, or no statement acknowledged by
the medical provider or sworn testimony as provided in subsections A
and B of this section is provided to the opposing party and listed
as an exhibit by the final pretrial hearing, then the amount billed
shall evidence to establish the reasonable value of the treatment
ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 2

prov ided to the injured party that shall be admissible at trial
subject to the limitations regarding any lien filed in the case is
limited to the amounts actually necessary to satisfy the financial
obligation for medical services or treatment rendered to the
plaintiff that have been incurred but not yet satisfied. This
evidence may not include any reference to sums that exceed the
amount for which the unpaid charges could be satisfied if submitted
to any health insurance covering the plaintiff or any public or
government-sponsored health care benefit program for which the
injured party is eligible, regardless of whether the incurred but
not yet satisfied charges have been or will be submitted to the
injured party’s health insurance or public or government-sponsored
health care benefit program.
D. This section shall apply to civil actions arising from
personal injury filed on or after November 1, 2015.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3009.2 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon the trial of any civil action arising from personal
injury, evidence admissible to establish the reasonable value of any
necessary future treatment of the injured party not yet incurred,
including doctor or other health care provider bills, attendant care
bills, hospital bills, ambulance service bills, drug and other
prescription or medical equipment bills, bills for materials needed
ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 3

in p roviding medical care and treatment for the party, and similar
bills shall be the amounts actually necessary to satisfy the
financial obligation for such treatment. Such evidence may not
include any reference to sums that exceed the amount for which the
financial obligation for future treatment of the injured party not
yet incurred could be satisfied if submitted to any health insurance
covering the injured party or any public or government-sponsored
health care benefit program for which the injured party is eligible.
B. If, at the time of trial, the reimbursement rate allowed by
any health insurance covering the injured party or any public or
government-sponsored health care benefit program for which the
injured party is eligible cannot be determined for any aspect of
necessary future treatment of the injured party not yet incurred,
then the Medicare reimbursement rates in effect at the time of trial
shall be the only amounts admissible at trial to establish the
reasonable value of any such necessary future treatment.
C. If, at the time of trial, the injured party is not covered
by any health insurance and is not eligible for coverage under any
private, public, or government-sponsored health care benefit
program, the Medicare reimbursement rates in effect at the time of
trial shall be the only amounts admissible at trial to establish the
reasonable value of any necessary future treatment of the injured
party not yet incurred.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 4

D. The provisions of this section shall apply to civil actions
arising from personal injury filed on or after the effective date of
this act.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives











ENGR. S. B. NO. 833 Page 5